Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.060

Examinations of out-of-state trust institutions—Periodic reports—Cooperative agreements—Assessment of fees.

(1) To the extent consistent with subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, the director may make such examinations and investigations of an out-of-state trust institution engaged in trust business in this state as the director may deem necessary to determine whether the out-of-state trust institution is being operated and maintained in a safe and sound manner in a manner affecting this state. Unless otherwise prescribed by rule, the provisions of Title 30A RCW applicable to examination or investigation of banks shall apply to such examinations or investigations of out-of-state trust institutions.

(2) The director may require periodic reports regarding any out-of-state trust institution engaged in trust business in this state. The required reports shall be provided by such out-of-state trust institution or by the home state regulator. Any reporting requirements prescribed by the director under this subsection shall be (a) consistent with the reporting requirements applicable to state trust companies and (b) appropriate for the purpose of enabling the director to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter.

(3) The director may enter into cooperative, coordinating, and information-sharing agreements with any other trust institution supervisory agency with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of an out-of-state trust institution engaging in trust business in this state, and the director may accept the report of examination and report of investigation of such agency in lieu of conducting his or her own examination or investigation.

(4) The director may enter into contracts with any trust institution supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over an out-of-state trust institution engaged in trust business in this state to engage the services of such agency's examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the director's examiners to such agency at a reasonable rate of compensation. Any such contract shall be deemed a sole source contract to the extent permitted under Washington state law.

(5) The director may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other trust institutions supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any out-of-state trust institution engaged in trust business in this state or by a state trust company doing business in any host state.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the director may at any time take enforcement action independently if the director deems such actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her responsibilities under this title or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state. However, in the case of an out-of-state trust institution, the director shall recognize the exclusive authority of the home state regulator over corporate governance matters and the primary responsibility of the home state regulator with respect to safety and soundness matters.

(7) An out-of-state trust institution that engages in trust business in this state and which is subject to examination by the director under any cooperative agreement between the director and the home state of the out-of-state trust institution, may be subject to supervisory, examination, and other fees, under authority of such cooperative agreement, RCW 30A.04.070, and as may be specified by rule.

[ 2014 c 37 s 372.]